Massachusetts, session 194th, S1670.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 12 of Chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking in line 6 the words “sling shot”; and by striking the clause 
“provided, however, that sling shots may be manufactured and sold to clubs or associations 
conducting sporting events where such sling shots are used.”